Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. General Provisions; Definitions

§ 4301.
Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the Vermont Planning and Development Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 4302.
Purpose; goals.

General purposes. It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to encourage the appropriate development of all lands in this State by the action of its constituent municipalities and regions, with the aid and assistance of the State, in a manner which will promote the public health, safety against fire, floods, explosions, and other dangers; to promote prosperity, comfort, access to adequate light and air, convenience, efficiency, economy, and general welfare; to enable the mitigation of the burden of property taxes on agricultural, forest, and other open lands; to encourage appropriate architectural design; to encourage the development of renewable resources; to protect residential, agricultural, and other areas from undue concentrations of population and overcrowding of land and buildings, from traffic congestion, from inadequate parking and the invasion of through traffic, and from the loss of peace, quiet, and privacy; to facilitate the growth of villages, towns, and cities and of their communities and neighborhoods so as to create an optimum environment, with good civic design; to encourage development of a rich cultural environment and to foster the arts; and to provide means and methods for the municipalities and regions of this State to plan for the prevention, minimization, and future elimination of such land development problems as may presently exist or which may be foreseen and to implement those plans when and where appropriate. In implementing any regulatory power under this chapter, municipalities shall take care to protect the constitutional right of the people to acquire, possess, and protect property.

It is also the intent of the Legislature that municipalities, regional planning commissions, and State agencies shall engage in a continuing planning process that will further the following goals:

To establish a coordinated, comprehensive planning process and policy framework to guide decisions by municipalities, regional planning commissions, and State agencies.

To encourage citizen participation at all levels of the planning process, and to assure that decisions shall be made at the most local level possible commensurate with their impact.

To consider the use of resources and the consequences of growth and development for the region and the State, as well as the community in which it takes place.

To encourage and assist municipalities to work creatively together to develop and implement plans.

In addition, this chapter shall be used to further the following specific goals:

To plan development so as to maintain the historic settlement pattern of compact village and urban centers separated by rural countryside.

Intensive residential development should be encouraged primarily in areas related to community centers, and strip development along highways should be discouraged.

Economic growth should be encouraged in locally designated growth areas, employed to revitalize existing village and urban centers, or both, and should be encouraged in growth centers designated under chapter 76A of this title.

Public investments, including the construction or expansion of infrastructure, should reinforce the general character and planned growth patterns of the area.

Development should be undertaken in accordance with smart growth principles as defined in subdivision 2791(13) of this title.

To provide a strong and diverse economy that provides satisfying and rewarding job opportunities and that maintains high environmental standards, and to expand economic opportunities in areas with high unemployment or low per capita incomes.

To broaden access to educational and vocational training opportunities sufficient to ensure the full realization of the abilities of all Vermonters.

To provide for safe, convenient, economic, and energy efficient transportation systems that respect the integrity of the natural environment, including public transit options and paths for pedestrians and bicyclers.

Highways, air, rail, and other means of transportation should be mutually supportive, balanced, and integrated.

To identify, protect, and preserve important natural and historic features of the Vermont landscape, including:

significant natural and fragile areas;

outstanding water resources, including lakes, rivers, aquifers, shorelands, and wetlands;

significant scenic roads, waterways, and views;

important historic structures, sites, or districts, archaeological sites, and archaeologically sensitive areas.

To maintain and improve the quality of air, water, wildlife, forests, and other land resources.

Vermont’s air, water, wildlife, mineral, and land resources should be planned for use and development according to the principles set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)

.

Vermont’s water quality should be maintained and improved according to the policies and actions developed in the basin plans established by the Secretary of Natural Resources under

10 V.S.A. § 1253

.

Vermont’s forestlands should be managed so as to maintain and improve forest blocks and habitat connectors.

To make efficient use of energy, provide for the development of renewable energy resources, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.

General strategies for achieving these goals include increasing the energy efficiency of new and existing buildings; identifying areas suitable for renewable energy generation; encouraging the use and development of renewable or lower emission energy sources for electricity, heat, and transportation; and reducing transportation energy demand and single occupancy vehicle use.

Specific strategies and recommendations for achieving these goals are identified in the State energy plans prepared under

30 V.S.A. §§ 202

and 202b.

To maintain and enhance recreational opportunities for Vermont residents and visitors.

Growth should not significantly diminish the value and availability of outdoor recreational activities.

Public access to noncommercial outdoor recreational opportunities, such as lakes and hiking trails, should be identified, provided, and protected wherever appropriate.

To encourage and strengthen agricultural and forest industries.

Strategies to protect long-term viability of agricultural and forestlands should be encouraged and should include maintaining low overall density.

The manufacture and marketing of value-added agricultural and forest products should be encouraged.

The use of locally-grown food products should be encouraged.

Sound forest and agricultural management practices should be encouraged.

Public investment should be planned so as to minimize development pressure on agricultural and forest land.

To provide for the wise and efficient use of Vermont’s natural resources and to facilitate the appropriate extraction of earth resources and the proper restoration and preservation of the aesthetic qualities of the area.

To ensure the availability of safe and affordable housing for all Vermonters.

Housing should be encouraged to meet the needs of a diversity of social and income groups in each Vermont community, particularly for those citizens of low and moderate income.

New and rehabilitated housing should be safe, sanitary, located conveniently to employment and commercial centers, and coordinated with the provision of necessary public facilities and utilities.

Sites for multi-family and manufactured housing should be readily available in locations similar to those generally used for single-family conventional dwellings.

Accessory apartments within or attached to single-family residences which provide affordable housing in close proximity to cost-effective care and supervision for relatives, elders, or persons who have a disability should be allowed.

To plan for, finance, and provide an efficient system of public facilities and services to meet future needs.

Public facilities and services should include fire and police protection, emergency medical services, schools, water supply, and sewage and solid waste disposal.

The rate of growth should not exceed the ability of the community and the area to provide facilities and services.

To ensure the availability of safe and affordable child care and to integrate child care issues into the planning process, including child care financing, infrastructure, business assistance for child care providers, and child care work force development.

To encourage flood resilient communities.

New development in identified flood hazard, fluvial erosion, and river corridor protection areas should be avoided. If new development is to be built in such areas, it should not exacerbate flooding and fluvial erosion.

The protection and restoration of floodplains and upland forested areas that attenuate and moderate flooding and fluvial erosion should be encouraged.

Flood emergency preparedness and response planning should be encouraged.

All plans and regulations prepared under the authority of this chapter shall be based upon surveys of existing conditions and probable future trends, and shall be made in the light of present and future growth and requirements, and with reasonable consideration, for the landowner, to topography, to needs and trends of the municipality, the region and the State, to the character of each area and to its peculiar suitability for particular uses in relationship to surrounding areas, and with a view to conserving the value of buildings.

Use of goals.

The goals established in this section shall be employed, as provided under this chapter, to carry out the general purposes established in this section.

After July 1, 1989, none of the following shall be prepared or adopted, unless consistent with the goals established in this section:

all plans prepared by regional planning commissions, and all plans required of State agencies under

3 V.S.A. § 4020

;

measures implementing State agency plans.

Standard of review.

As used in this chapter, “consistent with the goals” requires substantial progress toward attainment of the goals established in this section, unless the planning body determines that a particular goal is not relevant or attainable. If such a determination is made, the planning body shall identify the goal in the plan and describe the situation, explain why the goal is not relevant or attainable, and indicate what measures should be taken to mitigate any adverse effects of not making substantial progress toward that goal. The determination of relevance or attainability shall be subject to review as part of a consistency determination under this chapter.

As used in this chapter, for one plan to be “compatible with” another, the plan in question, as implemented, will not significantly reduce the desired effect of the implementation of the other plan. If a plan, as implemented, will significantly reduce the desired effect of the other plan, the plan may be considered compatible if it includes the following:

a statement that identifies the ways that it will significantly reduce the desired effect of the other plan;

an explanation of why any incompatible portion of the plan in question is essential to the desired effect of the plan as a whole;

an explanation of why, with respect to any incompatible portion of the plan in question, there is no reasonable alternative way to achieve the desired effect of the plan; and

an explanation of how any incompatible portion of the plan in question has been structured to mitigate its detrimental effects on the implementation of the other plan.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1969, No. 116

, § 1;

1979, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 1989;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1991, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 67

, § 7b;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 82;

2013, No. 16

, § 1, eff. July 1, 2014;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 161;

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 27, 2014;

2015, No. 64

, § 27;

2015, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 4303.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affordable housing” means either of the following:

Owner-occupied housing for which the total annual cost of ownership, including principal, interest, taxes, insurance, and condominium association fees, does not exceed 30 percent of the gross annual income of a household at 120 percent of the highest of the following:

the county median income, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development;

the standard metropolitan statistical area median income if the municipality is located in such an area, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development; or

the statewide median income, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.

Rental housing for which the total annual cost of renting, including rent, utilities, and condominium association fees, does not exceed 30 percent of the gross annual income of a household at 80 percent of the highest of the following:

the county median income, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development;

the standard metropolitan statistical area median income if the municipality is located in such an area, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development; or

the statewide median income, as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.

“Affordable housing development” means a housing development of which at least 20 percent of the units or a minimum of five units, whichever is greater, are affordable housing units. Affordable units shall be subject to covenants or restrictions that preserve their affordability for a minimum of 15 years or longer as provided in municipal bylaws.

“Appropriate municipal panel” means a planning commission performing development review, a board of adjustment, a development review board, or a legislative body performing development review.

“Bylaws” means municipal regulations applicable to land development adopted under the authority of this chapter.

“Capacity study” means an inventory of available natural and human-made resources, based on detailed data collection, that identifies the capacities and limits of those resources to absorb land development. Data gathered, relevant to the geographic information system, shall be compatible with, useful to, and shared with the geographic information system established under

3 V.S.A. § 20

.

“Conformance with the plan” means a proposed implementation tool, including a bylaw or bylaw amendment that is in accord with the municipal plan in effect at the time of adoption, when the bylaw or bylaw amendment includes all the following:

Makes progress toward attaining, or at least does not interfere with, the goals and policies contained in the municipal plan.

Provides for proposed future land uses, densities, and intensities of development contained in the municipal plan.

Carries out, as applicable, any specific proposals for community facilities, or other proposed actions contained in the municipal plan.

“Element” means a component of a plan.

“Flood hazard area” for purposes of sections 4348a, 4382, 4411, 4424, and 4469 of this title shall have the same meaning as “area of special flood hazard” under 44 C.F.R. § 59.1. Further, with respect to flood, river corridor protection area, and other hazard area regulation pursuant to this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Floodproofing” shall have the same meaning as “flood proofing” under 44 C.F.R. § 59.1.

“Floodway” shall have the same meaning as “regulatory floodway” under 44 C.F.R. § 59.1.

“Hazard area” means land subject to landslides, soil erosion, fluvial erosion, earthquakes, water supply contamination, or other natural or human-made hazards as identified within a “local mitigation plan” enacted under section 4424 of this title and in conformance with and approved pursuant to the provisions of 44 C.F.R. § 201.6.

“National Flood Insurance Program” means the National Flood Insurance Program under 42 U.S.C. chapter 50 and implementing federal regulations in 44 C.F.R. parts 59 and 60.

“New construction” means construction of structures or filling commenced on or after the effective date of the adoption of a community’s flood hazard bylaws.

“Substantial improvement” means any repair, reconstruction, or improvement of a structure, the cost of which equals or exceeds 50 percent of the market value of the structure either before the improvement or repair is started or, if the structure has been damaged and is being restored, before the damage occurred. However, the term does not include either of the following:

Any project or improvement of a structure to comply with existing State or local health, sanitary, or safety code specifications that are solely necessary to assure safe living conditions.

Any alteration of a structure listed on the National Register of Historic Places or a State inventory of historic places.

“Equilibrium condition” means the width, depth, meander pattern, and longitudinal slope of a stream channel that occurs when water flow, sediment, and woody debris are transported by the stream in such a manner that it generally maintains dimensions, pattern, and slope without unnaturally aggrading or degrading the channel bed elevation.

“Fluvial erosion” means the erosion or scouring of riverbeds and banks during high flow conditions of a river.

“River” means the full length and width, including the bed and banks, of any watercourse, including rivers, streams, creeks, brooks, and branches which experience perennial flow. “River” does not mean constructed drainageways, including water bars, swales, and roadside ditches.

“River corridor” means the land area adjacent to a river that is required to accommodate the dimensions, slope, planform, and buffer of the naturally stable channel and that is necessary for the natural maintenance or natural restoration of a dynamic equilibrium condition and for minimization of fluvial erosion hazards, as delineated by the Agency of Natural Resources in accordance with river corridor protection procedures.

“River corridor protection area” means the area within a delineated river corridor subject to fluvial erosion that may occur as a river establishes and maintains the dimension, pattern, and profile associated with its dynamic equilibrium condition and that would represent a hazard to life, property, and infrastructure placed within the area.

“Legislative body” means the selectboard in the case of a town, the trustees in the case of an incorporated village, and the mayor, alderpersons, and city council members in the case of a city, and the supervisor in the case of an unorganized town or gore.

“Land development” means the division of a parcel into two or more parcels, the construction, reconstruction, conversion, structural alteration, relocation, or enlargement of any building or other structure, or of any mining, excavation, or landfill, and any change in the use of any building or other structure, or land, or extension of use of land.

“Municipal land use permit” means any of the following whenever issued:

A zoning, subdivision, site plan, or building permit or approval, any of which relate to “land development” as defined in this section, that has received final approval from the applicable board, commission, or officer of the municipality.

A wastewater system permit issued under any municipal ordinance adopted pursuant to chapter 102 of this title.

Final official minutes of a meeting that relate to a permit or approval described in subdivision (11)(A) or (B) of this section that serve as the sole evidence of that permit or approval.

A certificate of occupancy, certificate of compliance, or similar certificate that relates to the permits or approvals described in subdivision (11)(A) or (B) of this section, if the bylaws so require.

An amendment of any of the documents listed in subdivisions (11)(A) through (D) and (F) of this section.

A certificate of approved location for a salvage yard issued under subchapter 10 of chapter 61 of this title.

“Municipality” means a town, a city, or an incorporated village or an unorganized town or gore. An incorporated village shall be deemed to be within the jurisdiction of a town for the purposes of this chapter, except to the extent that a village adopts its own plan and one or more bylaws either before, concurrently with, or subsequent to such action by the town, in which case the village shall have all authority granted a municipality under this chapter and the plans and bylaws of the town shall not apply during such period of time that said village plan and bylaws are in effect.

“Nonconforming lots or parcels” means lots or parcels that do not conform to the present bylaws covering dimensional requirements but were in conformance with all applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations prior to the enactment of the present bylaws, including a lot or parcel improperly authorized as a result of error by the administrative officer.

“Nonconforming structure” means a structure or part of a structure that does not conform to the present bylaws but was in conformance with all applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations prior to the enactment of the present bylaws, including a structure improperly authorized as a result of error by the administrative officer.

“Nonconforming use” means use of land that does not conform to the present bylaws but did conform to all applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations prior to the enactment of the present bylaws, including a use improperly authorized as a result of error by the administrative officer.

“Nonconformity” means a nonconforming use, structure, lot, or parcel.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, and any other incorporated or unincorporated organization or group.

“Plan” means a municipal plan adopted under section 4385 of this title.

“Planned unit development” means one or more lots, tracts, or parcels of land to be developed as a single entity, the plan for which may propose any authorized combination of density or intensity transfers or increases, as well as the mixing of land uses. This plan, as authorized, may deviate from bylaw requirements that are otherwise applicable to the area in which it is located with respect to lot size, bulk, or type of dwelling or building, use, density, intensity, lot coverage, parking, required common open space, or other standards.

“Planning commission” means a planning commission for a municipality created under subchapter 2 of this chapter.

“Public notice” means the form of notice prescribed by section 4444, 4449, or 4464 of this title, as the context requires.

“Regional plan” means a plan adopted under section 4348 of this title.

“Regional planning commission” means a planning commission for a region created under subchapter 3 of this chapter.

“Renewable energy resources” means energy available for collection or conversion from direct sunlight, wind, running water, organically derived fuels, including wood and agricultural sources, waste heat, and geothermal sources.

“Rural town” means a town having, as at the date of the most recent U.S. census, a population of less than 2,500 persons, as evidenced by that census, or a town having 2,500 or more but less than 5,000 persons that has voted by Australian ballot to be considered a rural town.

“Should” means that an activity is encouraged but not mandated.

“Structure” means an assembly of materials for occupancy or use, including a building, mobile home or trailer, sign, wall, or fence.

“Technical deficiency” means a defect in a proposed plan or bylaw, or an amendment or repeal thereof, correction of which does not involve substantive change to the proposal, including corrections to grammar, spelling, and punctuation, as well as the numbering of sections.

“Telecommunications facility” means a tower or other support structure, including antennae, that will extend 20 or more feet vertically, and related equipment, and base structures to be used primarily for communication or broadcast purposes to transmit or receive communication or broadcast signals.

“Transit pass” means any pass, token, fare card, voucher, or similar item entitling a person to transportation to and from work on mass transit facilities and provided by an employer consistent with Internal Revenue Code Section 132(f).

“Urban municipality” means a city, an incorporated village, or any town that is not a rural town.

“Wetlands” means those areas of the State that are inundated by surface or groundwater with a frequency sufficient to support vegetation or aquatic life that depend on saturated or seasonally saturated soil conditions for growth and reproduction. Such areas include marshes, swamps, sloughs, potholes, fens, river and lake overflows, mud flats, bogs, and ponds, but excluding such areas as grow food or crops in connection with farming activities.

“Public road” means a State highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1

or a class 1, 2, or 3 town highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 302(a)

. A municipality may, at its discretion, define a public road to also include a class 4 town highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 302(a)

.

“Forest block” means a contiguous area of forest in any stage of succession and not currently developed for nonforest use. A forest block may include recreational trails, wetlands, or other natural features that do not themselves possess tree cover, and uses exempt from regulation under subsection 4413(d) of this title.

“Forest fragmentation” means the division or conversion of a forest block by land development other than by a recreational trail or use exempt from regulation under subsection 4413(d) of this title.

“Habitat connector” means land or water, or both, that links patches of wildlife habitat within a landscape, allowing the movement, migration, and dispersal of animals and plants and the functioning of ecological processes. A habitat connector may include recreational trails and uses exempt from regulation under subsection 4413(d) of this title. In a plan or other document issued pursuant to this chapter, a municipality or regional plan commission may use the phrase “wildlife corridor” in lieu of “habitat connector.”

“Recreational trail” means a corridor that is not paved and that is used for hiking, walking, bicycling, cross-country skiing, snowmobiling, all-terrain vehicle riding, horseback riding, and other similar recreational activity.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1969, No. 116

, § 2;

1969, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 31, 1970;

1971, No. 78

, § 3, eff. April 16, 1971;

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. April 11, 1972;

1973, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 1974;

1975, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 1a, 2, 2a;

1985, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 1989;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Apr. 25, 1996;

1997, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 15, 1998;

1999, No. 46

, § 4, eff. May 26, 1999;

1999, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 83;

2009, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 14, 2012;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2013, No. 16

, § 2, eff. July 1, 2014;

2013, No. 34

, § 14;

2015, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Jan. 1, 2018;

2017, No. 69

, § H.2, eff. June 28, 2017.

§ 4303a.
Computation of time.

Where an event is required or permitted to occur by this chapter before, on, or after a specified period of time measured from another event, in calculating the period:

the first day shall not be counted; and

the final day shall be counted.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 4304.
Planning and land use manual.

The Commissioner of Housing and Community Development shall prepare, maintain, and distribute from time to time to all municipalities a manual setting forth:

a copy of this chapter, together with all amendments thereof;

examples of land planning policies, and maps and documents prepared in conformance with plan requirements;

an explanation and illustrative examples of bylaws, capital programs, budgets, and procedures authorized in this chapter; and

other explanatory material and data which will aid municipalities in the preparation of plans, capital budgets, programs, and the administration of bylaws authorized in this chapter.

The Commissioner of Housing and Community Development shall, from time to time, confer with interested persons with a view toward ensuring the maintenance of such manual in a form most useful to those regions and municipalities making use of it.

Sections of this manual may be cited in any plan or bylaw in the same manner as citations of this chapter, and may be incorporated by reference in any plan bylaw.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. April 11, 1972;

1975, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 27, 2014.

§ 4305.
Repealed. 2009, No. 146 (Adj. Sess), § G4, eff. June 1, 2010.

§ 4306.
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund.

The Municipal and Regional Planning Fund for the purpose of assisting municipal and regional planning commissions to carry out the intent of this chapter is hereby created in the State Treasury.
(a) (1) The Municipal and Regional Planning Fund for the purpose of assisting municipal and regional planning commissions to carry out the intent of this chapter is hereby created in the State Treasury.

The Fund shall be composed of 17 percent of the revenue from the property transfer tax under 32 V.S.A. chapter 231 and any monies from time to time appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly or received from any other source, private or public. All balances at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward and remain in the Fund. Interest earned by the Fund shall be deposited in the Fund.

Of the revenues in the Fund, each year:

10 percent shall be disbursed to the Vermont Center for Geographic Information;

70 percent shall be disbursed to the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development for performance contracts with regional planning commissions to provide regional planning services pursuant to section 4341a of this title; and

20 percent shall be disbursed to municipalities.

Allocations for performance contract funding to regional planning commissions shall be determined according to a formula to be adopted by rule under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 by the Department for the assistance of the regional planning commissions. Disbursement of funding to regional planning commissions shall be predicated upon meeting performance goals and targets pursuant to the terms of the performance contract.
(b) (1) Allocations for performance contract funding to regional planning commissions shall be determined according to a formula to be adopted by rule under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 by the Department for the assistance of the regional planning commissions. Disbursement of funding to regional planning commissions shall be predicated upon meeting performance goals and targets pursuant to the terms of the performance contract.

Disbursement to municipalities shall be awarded annually on or before December 31 through a competitive program administered by the Department providing the opportunity for any eligible municipality or municipalities to compete regardless of size, provided that to receive funds, a municipality:

shall be confirmed under section 4350 of this title; or

shall use the funds for the purpose of developing a municipal plan to be submitted for approval by the regional planning commission, as required for municipal confirmation under section 4350 of this title; and
(B) (i) shall use the funds for the purpose of developing a municipal plan to be submitted for approval by the regional planning commission, as required for municipal confirmation under section 4350 of this title; and

shall have voted at an annual or special meeting to provide local funds for municipal and regional planning purposes.

[Repealed.]

Funds allocated to municipalities shall be used for the purposes of:

funding the regional planning commission in undertaking capacity studies;

carrying out the provisions of subchapters 5 through 10 of this chapter; and

acquiring development rights, conservation easements, or title to those lands, areas, and strictures identified in either regional or municipal plans as requiring special consideration for provision of needed housing, aquifer protection, open space, farmland preservation, or other conservation purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1997, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

1999, No. 1

, § 97b, eff. March 31, 1999;

1999, No. 49

, § 80;

1999, No. 62

, § 263;

1999, No. 1

52 (Adj. Sess.), § 271d;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 84;

2003, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 12, 2004;

2005, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 9, 13;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G4;

2015, No. 11

, § 29.